Hawaii statutes.
[§572D-6] Enforcement. (a) A
premarital agreement is enforceable and shall be binding in any action unless
the party against whom enforcement is sought proves that:

(1) That party did not execute the agreement
voluntarily; or

(2) The agreement was unconscionable when it was
executed and, before execution of the agreement, that party:

(A) Was not provided a fair and reasonable
disclosure of the property or financial obligations of the other party;

(B) Did not voluntarily and expressly waive,
in writing, any right to disclosure of the property or financial obligations of
the other party beyond the disclosure provided; and

(C) Did not have, or reasonably could not
have had, an adequate knowledge of the property or financial obligations of the
other party.

(b) If a provision of a premarital agreement
modifies or eliminates spousal support and that modification or elimination
causes one party to the agreement to be eligible for support under a program of
public assistance at the time of separation or marital dissolution, a court,
notwithstanding the terms of the agreement, may require the other party to
provide support to the extent necessary to avoid eligibility for public
assistance.

(c) An issue of unconscionability of a
premarital agreement shall be decided by the court as a matter of law. [L 1987,
c 321, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next